Hawaii, session 2026, SB2098.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Chapter 141, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§141-    Clean plant program.  (a) There is established within the department of agriculture and biosecurity a clean plant program to support the production, maintenance, and distribution of disease-free, clean plant material for growers, nurseries, and other agricultural producers in the State. (b)  The clean plant program shall: (1)  Obtain plant materials from sources within the State and outside of the State; (2)  Diagnostically screen the plant materials to ensure the materials are free of harmful insects and diseases; (3)  Propagate these disease- and insect-free plant materials; (4)  Facilitate the distribution of clean plant material to growers, nurseries, and other agricultural producers in the State; (5)  Undertake activities required to optimize the production, maintenance, and distribution of clean plant material; (6)  Assess the economic impact of the clean plant program; and (7)  Perform other functions and activities that may be assigned by law. (c)  In developing the program required by this section, the department of agriculture and biosecurity may consult and partner with: (1)  Growers, nurseries, and other agricultural producers; and (2)  Agricultural research institutions. (d)  The department of agriculture and biosecurity shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter 91 necessary for the clean plant program, including but not limited to: (1)  The scope of agricultural crops and program services to be prioritized; and (2)  Processes for program quality coordination and management. (e)  The department of agriculture and biosecurity shall submit an annual progress report on the clean plant program to the legislature no later than twenty days prior to the convening of each regular session." SECTION 2.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $           or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 to develop and implement the clean plant program established by section 1 of this Act. The sum appropriated shall be expended by the department of agriculture and biosecurity for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 3.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2026. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________